Ohio, session 136, HB552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5164.16 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 5164.16. (A) The medicaid program may cover one or more state plan home and community-based services that the department of medicaid selects for coverage. A medicaid recipient of any age may receive a state plan home and community-based service if the recipient has countable income not exceeding two hundred twenty-five per cent of the federal poverty line, has a medical need for the service, and meets all other eligibility requirements for the service specified in rules adopted under section 5164.02 of the Revised Code. The rules may not require a medicaid recipient to undergo a level of care determination to be eligible for a state plan home and community-based service. (B) Effective not later than January 1, 2028, the director shall adopt rules specifying that a medicaid hospice provider shall be reimbursed for room and board for a hospice patient who is a resident of a nursing facility or an ICF/IID at an amount equal to one hundred per cent of the rate established for the nursing facility or ICF/IID for days when the patient receives routine home care or continuous home care. Section 2. That existing section 5164.16 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.